lexc/adj/enhuadjmnossz.lexc
LEXICON Possioptimista
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Famopt;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Famopt;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famopt;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famopt;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Famopt;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famopt;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famopt;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famopt;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famopt;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famopt;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famopt;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famopt;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famioptimista;

LEXICON Plurioptimista
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Genopt;
!+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1oe§k    Genopt;
                            Geni1ioptimista;

LEXICON Famioptimista
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genopt;
                       Geni1ioptimista;


LEXICON Geni1ioptimista
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseopt;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseopt;
                       Casei1ioptimista;

LEXICON Casei1ioptimista
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
!+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
                           Ik;



! AddIlyen helyett beépítve
LEXICON AddAdjI
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  TocaseI;

Lexicon TocaseI
[stem]+Adj:0     PossI;
[stem]+Adj:0     PlurI;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fam;

LEXICON PossI
+Acc:^+cAcc^§AA§t       #;  ! ilyet olyat
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;
LEXICON PlurI
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoeadjoe§k    Gen; !iek, iak
                            Gen;


LEXICON AddAdjat
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocaseat;

Lexicon Tocaseat
[stem]+Adj:0     Possat;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plur;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fam111;

LEXICON Possat
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Acc:^+cAcc^§AA§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam111;

!result
!legeslegkedvesebbet
!legeslegkedvesebben
!legkedvesebbet
!legkedvesebben
!kedvesebbet
!kedvesebben
!kedveset
!kedvesen

LEXICON Adj2num
fekvőhelyes AddAdjat;
hengercsatornás  AddAdjat;
lábtőízes AddAdjat;
negyedéves AddAdjat;
reffes AddAdjat;
szerhasználatos AddAdjat;
versszakos AddAdjat;
LEXICON Adj3igek
bomlatag AddAdjat;
fagyásbiztos AddAdjat;
huzatos AddAdjat;
lépésellenes AddAdjat;
tétköteles AddAdjat;
ömlésbiztos AddAdjat;
LEXICON Adj
acélkemény AddAdjat;
afóniás AddAdjat;
akronisztikus AddAdjat;
alattas AddAdjat;
allegórikus AddAdjat;
ambíciódús AddAdjat;
analgetikus AddAdjat;
anemometrikus AddAdjat;
anomalikus AddAdjat;
antidialektikus AddAdjat;
antifrikciós AddAdjat;
antimagnetikus AddAdjat;
antiszpazmodikus AddAdjat;
antropomorfisztikus AddAdjat;
apaellenes AddAdjat;
apróbarkás AddAdjat;
archaisztikus AddAdjat;
aromatikus AddAdjat;
aszkétikus AddAdjat;
atkaellenes AddAdjat;
atraumatikus AddAdjat;
autobiografikus AddAdjat;
autografikus AddAdjat;
autotoxikus AddAdjat;
axiómatikus AddAdjat;
bajbiztos AddAdjat;
bankbiztos AddAdjat;
barnaruhás AddAdjat;
barometrikus AddAdjat;
belvillás AddAdjat;
berlinies AddAdjat;
bibliaellenes AddAdjat;
billenékeny AddAdjat;
bioveszélyes AddAdjat;
bolhaellenes AddAdjat;
boxos AddAdjat;
bujakórellenes AddAdjat;
bársonypiros AddAdjat;
börtönbiztos AddAdjat;
bőszoknyás AddAdjat;
cenzúraellenes AddAdjat;
cionisztikus AddAdjat;
copákás AddAdjat;
csalásbiztos AddAdjat;
csendőrbiztos AddAdjat;
csodaellenes AddAdjat;
csorbás AddAdjat;
csög-bög AddAdjat;
cégellenes AddAdjat;
célspecifikus AddAdjat;
dadaellenes AddAdjat;
deformábilis AddAdjat;
demagógus AddAdjat;
devizaköteles AddAdjat;
diaszpórikus AddAdjat;
dikromatikus AddAdjat;
diszkordáns AddAdjat;
diétikus AddAdjat;
doktorandus AddAdjat;
drakonikus AddAdjat;
dundus AddAdjat;
duplapontos AddAdjat;
durábilis AddAdjat;
dízelelektromos AddAdjat;
eggyéforrt AddAdjat;
egészlapos AddAdjat;
ektópiás AddAdjat;
elektrometrikus AddAdjat;
ellenelektromos AddAdjat;
ellentípusos AddAdjat;
emeltdíjas AddAdjat;
endermikus AddAdjat;
eolitikus AddAdjat;
eretnekellenes AddAdjat;
erózióellenes AddAdjat;
eseményellenes AddAdjat;
eszterhéjas AddAdjat;
európaiellenes AddAdjat;
fajazonos AddAdjat;
faroknehéz AddAdjI;
farádos AddAdjat;
fehérliliomos AddAdjat;
fejnehéz AddAdjI;
feketepontos AddAdjat;
ferdelapátos AddAdjat;
filoxérabiztos AddAdjat;
fogkőellenes AddAdjat;
fonációs AddAdjat;
fotomechanikus AddAdjat;
fáyias AddAdjat;
félnehéz AddAdjI;
fénylőszemcsés AddAdjat;
fúzióellenes AddAdjat;
főfőnépbiztos AddAdjat;
gabógyás AddAdjat;
gepárdellenes AddAdjat;
gidres AddAdjat;
gombaellenes AddAdjat;
gyerekellenes AddAdjat;
gyónásköteles AddAdjat;
géhás AddAdjat;
halottfehér AddAdjat;
harapásbiztos AddAdjat;
hasmenésellenes AddAdjat;
hegemóniaellenes AddAdjat;
hibabiztos AddAdjat;
hidropneumatikus AddAdjat;
hiperkoagulábilis AddAdjat;
hipszometrikus AddAdjat;
hologramköteles AddAdjat;
homologikus AddAdjat;
hosszúhajós AddAdjat;
háborúterhes AddAdjat;
házasodásellenes AddAdjat;
húzásbiztos AddAdjat;
idealizmusellenes AddAdjat;
igazságellenes AddAdjat;
importellenes AddAdjat;
inflációszűrt AddAdjat;
integrációellenes AddAdjat;
intrikaellenes AddAdjat;
iratellenes AddAdjat;
iszlámellenes AddAdjat;
jasszos AddAdjat;
jobbgombos AddAdjat;
jugoszlávellenes AddAdjat;
jövedékköteles AddAdjat;
kalózkodásellenes AddAdjat;
kapitalisztikus AddAdjat;
karmazsinveres AddAdjat;
kattintgatós AddAdjat;
kemilumineszcens AddAdjat;
királybiztos AddAdjat;
kispolgárellenes AddAdjat;
klónozásellenes AddAdjat;
kommunisztikus AddAdjat;
kontrasztdús AddAdjat;
kormányfőbiztos AddAdjat;
kosztros AddAdjat;
kultuszellenes AddAdjat;
kutyaköteles AddAdjat;
kábítószermániás AddAdjat;
kékinges AddAdjat;
kémiaellenes AddAdjat;
készpénzszegény AddAdjat;
kínterhes AddAdjat;
költségérzékeny AddAdjat;
környezetellenes AddAdjat;
közellenes AddAdjat;
középmeleg AddAdjat;
külsarjas AddAdjat;
lavinabiztos AddAdjat;
lengőujjas AddAdjat;
lignitellenes AddAdjat;
logografikus AddAdjat;
lágymágneses AddAdjat;
légelektromos AddAdjat;
lézerbiztos AddAdjat;
magnéziumszegény AddAdjat;
makroszeizmikus AddAdjat;
materialisztikus AddAdjat;
megyespecifikus AddAdjat;
membránspecifikus AddAdjat;
metafizikaellenes AddAdjat;
mezőnyellenes AddAdjat;
minőségbiztos AddAdjat;
mizantropikus AddAdjat;
modemspecifikus AddAdjat;
monarchisztikus AddAdjat;
motivációszegény AddAdjat;
multiellenes AddAdjat;
márkaellenes AddAdjat;
médiumspecifikus AddAdjat;
mísz AddAdjat;
műfajellenes AddAdjat;
nagybirtokellenes AddAdjat;
nagymalmos AddAdjat;
napfénybiztos AddAdjat;
nemiségellenes AddAdjat;
neuronspecifikus AddAdjat;
normaellenes AddAdjat;
nyelvspecifikus AddAdjat;
nyomelemszegény AddAdjat;
nyúlellenes AddAdjat;
néprajzellenes AddAdjat;
obskurus AddAdjat;
oldószerszegény AddAdjat;
omlékony AddAdjat;
országellenes AddAdjat;
osztottpályás AddAdjat;
paleozoikus AddAdjat;
parazitaellenes AddAdjat;
pattellenes AddAdjat;
peniszes AddAdjat;
piezoeletromos AddAdjat;
planktonikus AddAdjat;
polgárellenes AddAdjat;
polinéz AddAdjI;
politikusellenes AddAdjat;
pornográfiaellenes AddAdjat;
poézisellenes AddAdjat;
problémaspecifikus AddAdjat;
prostitúcióellenes AddAdjat;
pszichopatológikus AddAdjat;
pálcavastag AddAdjat;
párabiztos AddAdjat;
pénzmosásellenes AddAdjat;
rabszolgabiztos AddAdjat;
rasszizmusellenes AddAdjat;
regényellenes AddAdjat;
rendeltetésellenes AddAdjat;
repedésbiztos AddAdjat;
rezsimellenes AddAdjat;
rockellenes AddAdjat;
rovátkos AddAdjat;
rákbiztos AddAdjat;
részecskeellenes AddAdjat;
rövidbundás AddAdjat;
sajtfehér AddAdjat;
sejtellenes AddAdjat;
sokkellenes AddAdjat;
spanyolfehér AddAdjat;
sportágellenes AddAdjat;
sugárellenes AddAdjat;
szabadszöveges AddAdjat;
szakmaspecifikus AddAdjat;
szaporodásképes AddAdjat;
szegénységellenes AddAdjat;
személyspecifikus AddAdjat;
szerelemterhes AddAdjat;
szervezőbiztos AddAdjat;
szexualitásellenes AddAdjat;
szimbólikus AddAdjat;
sziporkaszegény AddAdjat;
szocialistaellenes AddAdjat;
szomszédbiztos AddAdjat;
sztenografikus AddAdjat;
sztálinistaellenes AddAdjat;
szuperokos AddAdjat;
szállítóspecifikus AddAdjat;
szélvészgyors AddAdjat;
szónikus AddAdjat;
szövetspecifikus AddAdjat;
szürkésvöröses AddAdjat;
sárgáskékes AddAdjat;
süllyesztékes AddAdjat;
tamilellenes AddAdjat;
tanárellenes AddAdjat;
tartalomszűrt AddAdjat;
tejellenes AddAdjat;
telepbiztos AddAdjat;
tengelyellenes AddAdjat;
termelésellenes AddAdjat;
termoplasztikus AddAdjat;
terrorizmusellenes AddAdjat;
tettellenes AddAdjat;
tisztaságellenes AddAdjat;
torokharapdálós AddAdjat;
tranzakciószegény AddAdjat;
tumorellenes AddAdjat;
támogatásellenes AddAdjat;
tárgyspecifikus AddAdjat;
téglaoszlopos AddAdjat;
tévedésbiztos AddAdjat;
többévezredes AddAdjat;
történetellenes AddAdjat;
túlélésellenes AddAdjat;
tőkebiztos AddAdjat;
tűzoltóellenes AddAdjat;
ultrafontos AddAdjat;
ultratakarékos AddAdjat;
utasításellenes AddAdjat;
vadászellenes AddAdjat;
valutaszegény AddAdjat;
vegetariánus AddAdjat;
vetítettképes AddAdjat;
vitalisztikus AddAdjat;
vádlottellenes AddAdjat;
vámbiztos AddAdjat;
vételkész AddAdjat;
vörösruhás AddAdjat;
zokniellenes AddAdjat;
záporellenes AddAdjat;
zöldellenes AddAdjat;
zöldsávos AddAdjat;
áramvisszanyeréses AddAdjat;
átokterhes AddAdjat;
örménykatolikus AddAdjat;
útrakész AddAdjat;
